Washington statutes.
RCW 18.210.170

Professional development.

The board shall require licensees under this chapter to maintain continuing professional development. The board may require these licensees to demonstrate maintenance of knowledge and skills as a condition of license renewal, including peer review of work products and periodic reexamination.

[ 2011 c 256 s 10; 1999 c 263 s 18.]